New Jersey, session 222, A2309.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is established in the Department of Health a long-term services and supports (LTSS) workforce engagement and sustainability program.  The purpose of the program shall be to employ various strategies to support, and increase the supply of, LTSS direct care workers in this State in both institutional and community-based settings. b.  The program shall, at a minimum, require the Department of Health to: (1)  in collaboration with the Department of Human Services, conduct a periodic review of the impact of the States Medicaid payment policies on LTSS direct care workers total compensation, including paid time off; (2)  identify any available federal COVID-19 funds that can be used to provide bonuses to individuals who worked in LTSS settings during the COVID-19 pandemic, including, but not limited to, LTSS direct care workers and housekeeping, kitchen, and transportation staff, who worked in LTSS settings; (3)  to the extent possible, develop a single curriculum and training program for LTSS direct care workers in both institutional and community-based system; (4)  develop incentives for LTSS providers to establish advanced roles to facilitate career advancement for LTSS direct care workers; (5)  adopt regulations to permit certified medication aides to work in nursing homes; (6)  provide free or reduced tuition, award scholarships, or loan forgiveness to individuals interested in working in LTSS; (7)  develop an online, hybrid approach to credentialing or certification for direct care workers, which shall include a mix of online training, in-person instruction and skills testing, and written testing, which written testing shall provide accommodations for individuals who have English as a second language; (8)  develop additional testing sites for certified nurse aides and certified homemaker home-health aides; (9)  identify opportunities to streamline the out-of-state reciprocity process for LTSS direct care workers and assess the feasibility of adopting interstate compacts to encourage LTSS direct care workers from other States to work in New Jersey; (10)  conduct a public awareness campaign to inform the public about the positive and rewarding aspects of working in an LTSS setting; (11)  in collaboration with the Department of Education, seek to establish credit programs for high school students interested in working in LTSS; (12)  in collaboration with the Department of Education, encourage institutions of higher education in this State that provide medical education to require students to complete a clinical rotation through a LTSS setting and to include geriatric and palliative medicine into any applicable curriculum; and (13)  develop incentives for nurses to become nurse instructors and assess whether the educational requirements for nurse instructors should be modified to fulfill the States need for nurse instructors and nurses. 2.  No later than one year after the effective date of this act and annually thereafter, the Commissioner of Health shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature a report on the implementation of the program, which report shall include any recommendations for administrative or legislative action that the commissioner deems necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to support, and increase the supply of, LTSS direct care workers in this State. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.